Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.035

Practice in court.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the rules of evidence and civil procedure, including rules concerning appellate review, govern a proceeding under this chapter.

(2) If proceedings for a guardianship, conservatorship, or protective arrangement under Article 5 of this chapter for the same individual are commenced or pending in the same court, the proceedings may be consolidated.

(3) An adult respondent may demand a jury trial in a proceeding under this chapter on the issue of whether a basis exists for the appointment of a guardian under RCW 11.130.265 or a conservator under RCW 11.130.360(2) and on the rights to be retained or restricted if a guardian or conservator is appointed.

(4) Upon the motion of the respondent or the court visitor, prior to the appointment of a guardian or a conservator or the establishment of a protective arrangement for an adult, or upon the motion of the respondent, guardian, conservator, or any notice party subsequent to such appointment, whenever it appears that the adult respondent could benefit from mediation, the court may require the petitioner, adult respondent, guardian, conservator, and any notice party to participate in mediation pursuant to RCW 11.96A.300.

[ 2020 c 312 s 302; 2019 c 437 s 107.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.